Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,223
Scope of inspection right.

(MBCA 16.03) (a) A shareholder's
agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder
represented.

(b) The right to copy records
under section 21-2,222 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies
by xerographic or other means, including copies through an electronic transmission
if available and so requested by the shareholder.

(c) The corporation may comply at its
expense with a shareholder's demand to inspect the record of shareholders
under subdivision (c)(3) of section 21-2,222 by providing the shareholder
with a list of shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of
the shareholder's demand.

(d)
The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor
and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The
charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production, reproduction, or transmission
of the records.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 223.